Maryland, session 2025, HB1528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Student Athlete Name, Image, and Likeness
Programs in Maryland.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate, one whom is a member of the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee and one
whom is a member of the Senate Finance Committee;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House, one of whom is a member of the House Economic Matters Committee and one
whom is a member of the House Ways and Means Committee;
(3) two representatives from the University of Maryland, College Park’s
Athletic Department, designated by the President of the University; and
(4) five representatives appointed by the Governor who have expertise or
experience with:
(i) revenue sharing programs at universities;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1528*

HOUSE BILL 1528
(ii) name, image, and likeness programs; or
(iii) any other individuals with expertise the Governor determines is
relevant to the work of the Task Force.
(c) The Task Force shall designate the Chair of the Task Force from among its
members.
(d) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(e) The Task Force shall study and make recommendations on the following:
(1) how the House v. NCAA case settlement may affect revenue sharing
programs at the University of Maryland, College Park and other universities in the State;
and
(2) the future use of name, image, and likeness programs for student
athletes in the State.
(f) The Maryland Higher Education Commission shall provide staff for the Task
Force.
(g) On or before December 1, 2025, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate Finance
Committee, House Economic Matters Committee, and House Ways and Means Committee
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.